Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 7. LIFE INSURANCE AND ANNUITIES

SUBTITLE A. LIFE INSURANCE IN GENERAL

CHAPTER 1111A. LIFE SETTLEMENT CONTRACTS

Sec. 1111A.001. SHORT TITLE. This Act may be cited as the Life Settlements Act.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.002. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Advertisement" means a written, electronic, or printed communication or a communication by means of a recorded telephone message or transmitted on radio, television, the Internet, or similar communications media, including film strips, motion pictures, and videos, published, disseminated, circulated, or placed directly before the public for the purpose of creating an interest in or inducing a person to purchase or sell, assign, devise, bequest, or transfer the death benefit or ownership of a life insurance policy or an interest in a life insurance policy under a life settlement contract.

(2) "Broker" means a person who, on behalf of an owner and for a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration, offers or attempts to negotiate a life settlement contract between an owner and a provider or estimates life expectancies for a life settlement contract. A broker who offers or attempts to negotiate a life settlement contract represents only the owner and owes a fiduciary duty to the owner to act according to the owner's instructions, and in the best interest of the owner, notwithstanding the manner in which the broker is compensated. A broker does not include an attorney, certified public accountant, or financial planner retained in the type of practice customarily performed in a professional capacity to represent the owner whose compensation is not paid directly or indirectly by the provider or any other person, except the owner.

(3) "Business of life settlements" means an activity involved in, but not limited to, offering to enter into, soliciting, negotiating, procuring, effectuating, monitoring, or tracking, of life settlement contracts.

(4) "Chronically ill" means:

(A) being unable to perform at least two activities of daily living such as eating, toileting, transferring, bathing, dressing, or continence;

(B) requiring substantial supervision to protect the individual from threats to health and safety due to severe cognitive impairment; or

(C) having a level of disability similar to that described in Paragraph (A) as determined under rules adopted by the commissioner after consideration of any applicable regulation, guideline, or determination of the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services.

(5) "Financing entity" means an underwriter, placement agent, lender, purchaser of securities, purchaser of a policy or certificate from a provider, credit enhancer, or any entity that has a direct ownership in a policy or certificate that is the subject of a life settlement contract whose principal activity related to the transaction is providing funds to effect the life settlement contract or purchase of a policy, and who has an agreement in writing with a provider to finance the acquisition of a life settlement contract. The term does not include a non-accredited investor or purchaser.

(6) "Financing transaction" means a transaction in which a licensed provider obtains financing from a financing entity including secured or unsecured financing, a securitization transaction, or a securities offering that is either registered or exempt from registration under federal and state securities law.

(7) "Fraudulent life settlement act" includes:

(A) an act or omission committed by a person who, knowingly and with intent to defraud, for the purpose of depriving another of property or for pecuniary gain, commits, or permits an employee or an agent to engage in, acts including:

(i) presenting, causing to be presented, or preparing with knowledge and belief that it will be presented to or by a provider, premium finance lender, broker, insurer, insurance agent, or any other person, false material information, or concealing material information, as part of, in support of, or concerning a fact material to one or more of the following:

(a) an application for the issuance of a life settlement contract or an insurance policy;

(b) the underwriting of a life settlement contract or an insurance policy;

(c) a claim for payment or benefit pursuant to a life settlement contract or an insurance policy;

(d) premium paid on an insurance policy;

(e) payment for and changes in ownership or beneficiary made in accordance with the terms of a life settlement contract or an insurance policy;

(f) the reinstatement or conversion of an insurance policy;

(g) in the solicitation, offer to enter into, or effectuation of a life settlement contract, or an insurance policy;

(h) the issuance of written evidence of life settlement contracts or insurance; or

(i) an application for or the existence of or any payment related to a loan secured directly or indirectly by an interest in a life insurance policy;

(ii) failing to disclose to the insurer, if the insurer has requested the disclosure, that the prospective insured has undergone a life expectancy evaluation by any person or entity other than the insurer or its authorized representatives in connection with the issuance of the policy; or

(iii) employing a device, scheme, or artifice to defraud in the business of life settlements; and

(B) acts or omissions in the furtherance of a fraud or to prevent the detection of a fraud, or acts or omissions that permit an employee or an agent to:

(i) remove, conceal, alter, destroy, or sequester from the commissioner the assets or records of a license holder or another person engaged in the business of life settlements;

(ii) misrepresent or conceal the financial condition of a license holder, financing entity, insurer, or other person;

(iii) transact the business of life settlements in violation of laws requiring a license, certificate of authority, or other legal authority for the transaction of the business of life settlements;

(iv) file with the commissioner or the chief insurance regulatory official of another jurisdiction a document containing false information or concealing information about a material fact;

(v) engage in embezzlement, theft, misappropriation, or conversion of monies, funds, premiums, credits, or other property of a provider, insurer, insured, owner, insurance policy owner, or any other person engaged in the business of life settlements or insurance;

(vi) knowingly and with intent to defraud, enter into, broker, or otherwise deal in a life settlement contract, the subject of which is a life insurance policy that was obtained by presenting false information concerning any fact material to the policy or by concealing that fact, for the purpose of misleading another, or providing information concerning any fact material to the policy, if the owner or the owner's agent intended to defraud the policy's issuer;

(vii) attempt to commit, assist, aid or abet in the commission of, or engage in conspiracy to commit the acts or omissions specified in this paragraph; or

(viii) misrepresent the state of residence of an owner to be a state or jurisdiction that does not have a law substantially similar to this chapter for the purpose of evading or avoiding the provisions of this chapter.

(8) "Insured" means a person covered under the policy being considered for sale in a life settlement contract.

(9) "Life expectancy" means the arithmetic mean of the number of months the insured under the life insurance policy to be settled can be expected to live as determined by a life expectancy company or provider considering medical records and appropriate experiential data.

(10) "Life insurance agent" means a person licensed in this state as a resident or nonresident insurance agent who has received qualification or authority to write life insurance coverage under this code.

(11) "Life settlement contract" means a written agreement entered into between a provider and an owner establishing the terms under which compensation or anything of value will be paid and is less than the expected death benefit of the insurance policy or certificate, in return for the owner's assignment, transfer, sale, devise, or bequest of the death benefit or a portion of an insurance policy or certificate of insurance for compensation; provided, however, that the minimum value for a life settlement contract must be greater than a cash surrender value or accelerated death benefit available at the time of an application for a life settlement contract. The term also includes the transfer for compensation or value of ownership or beneficial interest in a trust or other entity that owns the policy if the trust or other entity was formed or used for the principal purpose of acquiring one or more life insurance contracts that insure the life of an individual residing in this state. The term also includes:

(A) a written agreement for a loan or other lending transaction, secured primarily by an individual or group life insurance policy; and

(B) a premium finance loan made for a policy on or before the date of issuance of the policy if:

(i) the loan proceeds are not used solely to pay premiums for the policy and any costs or expenses incurred by the lender or the borrower in connection with the financing;

(ii) the owner receives on the date of the premium finance loan a guarantee of the future life settlement value of the policy; or

(iii) the owner agrees on the date of the premium finance loan to sell the policy or any portion of its death benefit on a date following the issuance of the policy.

(11-A) "Life settlement contract" does not include:

(A) a policy loan by a life insurance company under the terms of a life insurance policy or accelerated death provision contained in the life insurance policy, whether issued with the original policy or as a rider;

(B) a premium finance loan or any loan made by a bank or other licensed financial institution, provided that neither default on the loan nor the transfer of the policy in connection with the default is under an agreement or understanding with any other person for the purpose of evading regulation under this chapter;

(C) a collateral assignment of a life insurance policy by an owner;

(D) a loan made by a lender that does not violate Chapter 651, provided that the loan is not described in Subdivision (11) and is not otherwise within the definition of life settlement contract;

(E) an agreement with respect to which all the parties are closely related to the insured by blood or law or have a lawful substantial economic interest in the continued life, health, and bodily safety of the person insured, or are trusts established primarily for the benefit of the parties;

(F) a designation, consent, or agreement by an insured who is an employee of an employer in connection with the purchase by the employer, or trust established by the employer, of life insurance on the life of the employee;

(G) a bona fide business succession planning arrangement:

(i) between one or more shareholders in a corporation or between a corporation and one or more of its shareholders or one or more trusts established by its shareholders;

(ii) between one or more partners in a partnership or between a partnership and one or more of its partners or one or more trusts established by its partners; or

(iii) between one or more members in a limited liability company or between a limited liability company and one or more of its members or one or more trusts established by its members;

(H) an agreement entered into by a service recipient, or a trust established by the service recipient, and a service provider, or a trust established by the service provider, who performs significant services for the service recipient's trade or business; or

(I) any other contract, transaction, or arrangement from the definition of life settlement contract that the commissioner determines is not of the type intended to be regulated by this chapter.

(12) "Net death benefit" means the amount of the life insurance policy or certificate to be settled less any outstanding debts or liens.

(13) "Owner" means the owner of a life insurance policy or a certificate holder under a group policy, with or without a terminal illness, who enters or seeks to enter into a life settlement contract. In this chapter, the term "owner" is not limited to an owner of a life insurance policy or a certificate holder under a group policy that insures the life of an individual with a terminal or chronic illness or condition except as specifically provided. The term does not include:

(A) a provider or other license holder under this chapter;

(B) a qualified institutional buyer as defined by 17 C.F.R. Section 230.144A, as amended;

(C) a financing entity;

(D) a special purpose entity; or

(E) a related provider trust.

(14) "Patient identifying information" means an insured's address, telephone number, facsimile number, e-mail address, photograph or likeness, employer, employment status, social security number, or any other information that is likely to lead to the identification of the insured.

(15) "Policy" means an individual or group policy, group certificate, contract, or arrangement of life insurance owned by a resident of this state, regardless of whether delivered or issued for delivery in this state.

(16) "Premium finance loan" is a loan made primarily for the purposes of making premium payments on a life insurance policy that is secured by an interest in the life insurance policy.

(17) "Person" means an individual or legal entity, including a partnership, limited liability company, association, trust, or corporation.

(18) "Provider" means a person, other than an owner, who enters into or effectuates a life settlement contract with an owner. The term does not include:

(A) a bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union;

(B) a licensed lending institution or creditor or secured party pursuant to a premium finance loan agreement that takes an assignment of a life insurance policy or certificate issued pursuant to a group life insurance policy as collateral for a loan;

(C) the insurer of a life insurance policy or rider to the extent of providing accelerated death benefits or riders under Subchapter B, Chapter 1111, or cash surrender value;

(D) an individual who enters into or effectuates not more than one agreement in a calendar year for the transfer of a life insurance policy or certificate issued pursuant to a group life insurance policy, for compensation or anything of value less than the expected death benefit payable under the policy;

(E) a purchaser;

(F) any authorized or eligible insurer that provides stop loss coverage to a provider, purchaser, financing entity, special purpose entity, or related provider trust;

(G) a financing entity;

(H) a special purpose entity;

(I) a related provider trust;

(J) a broker; or

(K) an accredited investor or qualified institutional buyer as those terms are defined by 17 C.F.R. Sections 230.501 and 230.144A, respectively, as amended, who purchases a life settlement policy from a provider.

(19) "Purchased policy" means a policy or group certificate that has been acquired by a provider pursuant to a life settlement contract.

(20) "Purchaser" means a person who pays compensation or anything of value as consideration for a beneficial interest in a trust that is vested with, or for the assignment, transfer, or sale of, an ownership or other interest in a life insurance policy or a certificate issued pursuant to a group life insurance policy that has been the subject of a life settlement contract.

(21) "Related provider trust" means a titling trust or other trust established by a licensed provider or a financing entity for the sole purpose of holding the ownership or beneficial interest in purchased policies in connection with a financing transaction. In order to qualify as a related provider trust, the trust must have a written agreement with the licensed provider under which the licensed provider is responsible for ensuring compliance with all statutory and regulatory requirements and under which the trust agrees to make all records and files relating to life settlement transactions available to the department as if those records and files were maintained directly by the licensed provider.

(22) "Settled policy" means a life insurance policy or certificate that has been acquired by a provider pursuant to a life settlement contract.

(23) "Special purpose entity" means a corporation, partnership, trust, limited liability company, or other legal entity formed solely to provide either directly or indirectly access to institutional capital markets:

(A) for a financing entity or provider; or

(B) in connection with a transaction in which:

(i) the securities in the special purpose entity are acquired by the owner or by a qualified institutional buyer as defined by 17 C.F.R. Section 230.144A, as amended; or

(ii) the securities pay a fixed rate of return commensurate with established asset-backed institutional capital markets.

(24) "Terminally ill" means having an illness or sickness that can reasonably be expected to result in death not later than 24 months after the date of diagnosis.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.003. LICENSING REQUIREMENTS; EXEMPTION. (a) A person, wherever located, may not act as a provider or broker with an owner who is a resident of this state, unless the person holds a license from the department.

(b) An application for a provider or broker license must be made to the department by the applicant on a form prescribed by the commissioner. The application must be accompanied by a fee in an amount established by the commissioner by rule. The license and renewal fees for a provider license must be reasonable and the license and renewal fees for a broker license may not exceed those established for an insurance agent, as otherwise provided by this chapter.

(c) A person who has been licensed as a life insurance agent in this state or the person's home state for at least one year and is licensed as a nonresident agent in this state meets the licensing requirements of this section and may operate as a broker.

(d) Not later than the 30th day after the first date of operating as a broker, a life insurance agent shall notify the commissioner on a form prescribed by the commissioner that the agent is acting as a broker and shall pay any applicable fee to be determined by the commissioner by rule. Notification must include an acknowledgement by the life insurance agent that the agent will operate as a broker in accordance with this chapter.

(e) An insurer that issued a policy that is the subject of a life settlement contract is not responsible for any act or omission of a broker or provider or purchaser arising out of or in connection with the life settlement transaction, unless the insurer receives compensation for the placement of a life settlement contract from the provider, purchaser, or broker in connection with the life settlement contract.

(f) A person licensed as an attorney, certified public accountant, or financial planner accredited by a nationally recognized accreditation agency, who is retained to represent the owner and whose compensation is not paid directly or indirectly by the provider or purchaser, may negotiate life settlement contracts for the owner without having to obtain a license as a broker.

(g) A license expires on the second anniversary of the date of issuance. A license holder may renew the license on payment of a renewal fee. As specified by Subsection (b), the renewal fee for a provider license may not exceed a reasonable fee.

(h) An applicant shall provide the information that the commissioner requires on forms adopted by the commissioner. The commissioner may, at any time, require an applicant to fully disclose the identity of its stockholders, except stockholders owning fewer than 10 percent of the shares of an applicant whose shares are publicly traded, partners, officers and employees, and the commissioner may, in the exercise of the commissioner's sole discretion, refuse to issue a license in the name of any person if the commissioner is not satisfied that an officer, an employee, a stockholder, or a partner of the applicant who may materially influence the applicant's conduct meets the standards of Sections 1111A.001 to 1111A.018.

(i) A license issued to a partnership, corporation, or other entity authorizes each member, officer, and designated employee named in the application and any supplement to the application to act as a license holder under the license.

(j) After the filing of an application and the payment of the license fee, the commissioner shall investigate each applicant and may issue a license if the commissioner finds that the applicant:

(1) if a provider, has provided a detailed plan of operation;

(2) is competent and trustworthy and intends to transact business in good faith;

(3) has a good business reputation and has had experience, training, or education to qualify in the business for which the license is applied;

(4) if the applicant is a legal entity, is formed or organized under the laws of this state or is a foreign legal entity authorized to transact business in this state, or provides a certificate of good standing from the state of its domicile; and

(5) has provided to the commissioner an antifraud plan that meets the requirements of Section 1111A.022 and includes:

(A) a description of the procedures for detecting and investigating possible fraudulent acts and procedures for resolving material inconsistencies between medical records and insurance applications;

(B) a description of the procedures for reporting fraudulent insurance acts to the commissioner;

(C) a description of the plan for antifraud education and training of its underwriters and other personnel; and

(D) a written description or chart outlining the arrangement of the antifraud personnel who are responsible for the investigation and reporting of possible fraudulent insurance acts and the investigation of unresolved material inconsistencies between medical records and insurance applications.

(k) The commissioner may not issue a license to a nonresident applicant unless a written designation of an agent for service of process is filed and maintained with the department or unless the applicant has filed with the department the applicant's written irrevocable consent that any action against the applicant may be commenced by service of process on the commissioner.

(l) A license holder shall file with the department not later than March 1 of each year an annual statement containing the information as the commissioner by rule prescribes.

(m) A provider may not allow any person to perform the functions of a broker unless the person holds a current, valid license as a broker, and as provided in this section.

(n) A broker may not allow any person to perform the functions of a provider unless the person holds a current, valid license as a provider, and as provided in this section.

(o) A provider or broker shall provide to the commissioner new or revised information about officers, stockholders described by Subsection (h), partners, directors, members, or designated employees within 30 days of the change.

(p) An individual licensed as a broker shall complete on a biennial basis 15 hours of training related to life settlements and life settlement transactions, as required by the commissioner. A life insurance agent who is operating as a broker under this section is not subject to the requirements of this subsection.

(q) The business of life settlements constitutes the business of insurance.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.004. LICENSE SUSPENSION, REVOCATION, OR REFUSAL TO RENEW. (a) The commissioner may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew the license of a license holder if the commissioner finds that:

(1) there was a material misrepresentation in the application for the license;

(2) the license holder or an officer, partner, member, or director of the license holder has been guilty of fraudulent or dishonest practices, is subject to a final administrative action, or is otherwise shown to be untrustworthy or incompetent to act as a license holder;

(3) the license holder is a provider and demonstrates a pattern of unreasonably withholding payments to policy owners;

(4) the license holder no longer meets the requirements for initial licensure;

(5) the license holder or any officer, partner, member, or director of the license holder has been convicted of a felony, or of any misdemeanor with respect to which criminal fraud is an element, or has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere with respect to a felony or a misdemeanor with respect to which criminal fraud or moral turpitude is an element, regardless of whether a judgment of conviction has been entered by the court;

(6) the license holder is a provider and has entered into a life settlement contract using a form that has not been approved under this chapter;

(7) the license holder is a provider and has failed to honor contractual obligations in a life settlement contract;

(8) the license holder is a provider and has assigned, transferred, or pledged a settled policy to a person other than a provider licensed in this state, a purchaser, an accredited investor or qualified institutional buyer as defined respectively in 17 C.F.R. Section 230.144A, as amended, a financing entity, a special purpose entity, or a related provider trust; or

(9) the license holder or any officer, partner, member, or key management personnel of the license holder has violated this chapter.

(b) The commissioner may deny a license application or suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew the license of a license holder in accordance with Chapter 2001, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.005. REQUIREMENTS FOR CONTRACT FORMS, DISCLOSURE FORMS, AND ADVERTISEMENTS. (a) A person may not use any form of life settlement contract in this state unless the form has been filed with and approved, if required, by the commissioner in a manner that conforms with the filing procedures and any time restrictions or deeming provisions for life insurance forms, policies, and contracts.

(b) An insurer may not, as a condition of responding to a request for verification of coverage or in connection with the transfer of a policy pursuant to a life settlement contract, require that the owner, insured, provider, or broker sign any form, disclosure, consent, waiver, or acknowledgment that has not been expressly approved by the commissioner for use in connection with life settlement contracts.

(c) A person may not use a life settlement contract form or provide to an owner a disclosure statement form unless the form is first filed with and approved by the commissioner. The commissioner shall disapprove a life settlement contract form or disclosure statement form if, in the commissioner's opinion, the contract or contract provisions fail to meet the requirements of Sections 1111A.011, 1111A.012, 1111A.014, and 1111A.023(b), or are unreasonable, contrary to the interests of the public, or otherwise misleading or unfair to the owner.

(d) At the commissioner's discretion, the commissioner may require the submission of advertisements.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.006. REPORTING REQUIREMENTS AND PRIVACY. (a) For a policy settled not later than the fifth anniversary of the date of policy issuance, each provider shall file with the commissioner not later than March 1 of each year an annual statement containing the information that the commissioner prescribes by rule. In addition to any other requirements, the annual statement must specify the total number, aggregate face amount, and life settlement proceeds of policies settled during the immediately preceding calendar year, together with a breakdown of the information by policy issue year. The annual statement must also include the names of each insurance company whose policies have been settled and the brokers that have settled the policies.

(b) The information required under Subsection (a) is limited to only those transactions in which the insured is a resident of this state and may not include individual transaction data regarding the business of life settlements or information if there is a reasonable basis to find that the information could be used to identify the owner or the insured.

(c) A provider that wilfully fails to file an annual statement as required in this section, or wilfully fails to reply not later than the 30th day after the date the provider receives a written inquiry from the department about the filing of the annual statement, shall, in addition to other penalties provided by this chapter, after notice and opportunity for hearing be subject to a penalty of up to $250 for each day of delay, not to exceed $25,000 in the aggregate, for the failure to file or respond.

(d) Except as otherwise allowed or required by law, a provider, broker, insurance company, insurance agent, information bureau, rating agency or company, or any other person with actual knowledge of an insured's identity, may not disclose the identity of an insured or information that there is a reasonable basis to believe could be used to identify the insured or the insured's financial or medical information to any other person unless the disclosure is:

(1) necessary to effect a life settlement contract between the owner and a provider and the owner and insured have provided prior written consent to the disclosure;

(2) necessary to effectuate the sale of a life settlement contract, or interests in the contract, as an investment, provided the sale is conducted in accordance with applicable state and federal securities law and provided further that the owner and the insured have both provided prior written consent to the disclosure;

(3) provided in response to an investigation or examination by the commissioner or another governmental officer or agency or under Section 1111A.018;

(4) a term or condition of the transfer of a policy by one provider to another licensed provider, in which case the receiving provider shall comply with the confidentiality requirements of this subsection;

(5) necessary to allow the provider or broker or the provider's or broker's authorized representative to make contact for the purpose of determining health status provided that in this subdivision, authorized representative does not include a person who has or may have a financial interest in the settlement contract other than a provider, licensed broker, financing entity, related provider trust, or special purpose entity and that the provider or broker requires the authorized representative to agree in writing to adhere to the privacy provisions of this chapter; or

(6) required to purchase stop loss coverage.

(e) Nonpublic personal information solicited or obtained in connection with a proposed or actual life settlement contract is subject to the provisions applicable to financial institutions under the federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (Pub. L. No. 106-102), and any other state and federal laws relating to confidentiality of nonpublic personal information.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.007. EXAMINATION. Subchapter B, Chapter 401, applies to a person engaged in the business of life settlements.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.008. IMMUNITY FROM LIABILITY. (a) No cause of action shall arise nor shall any liability be imposed against the commissioner, the commissioner's authorized representatives, or any examiner appointed by the commissioner for a statement made or conduct performed in good faith while carrying out this chapter.

(b) No cause of action shall arise, nor shall any liability be imposed against any person for the act of communicating or delivering information to the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized representative or examiner pursuant to an examination made under this chapter, if the act of communication or delivery was performed in good faith and without fraudulent intent or the intent to deceive. This subsection does not abrogate or modify in any way any common law or statutory privilege or immunity enjoyed by any person identified in Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.009. INVESTIGATIVE AUTHORITY OF THE COMMISSIONER. The commissioner may investigate a suspected fraudulent life settlement act and a person engaged in the business of life settlements.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.010. COST OF EXAMINATIONS. The reasonable and necessary cost of an examination under this chapter is to be assessed against the person being examined in accordance with Section 751.208.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.011. ADVERTISING. (a) A broker or provider licensed pursuant to this chapter may conduct or participate in an advertisement in this state. The advertisement must comply with all advertising and marketing laws under Chapter 541 and rules adopted by the commissioner that are applicable to life insurers or to license holders under this chapter.

(b) Advertisements shall be accurate, truthful, and not misleading in fact or by implication.

(c) A person may not:

(1) market, advertise, solicit, or otherwise promote the purchase of a policy for the sole purpose of or with an emphasis on settling the policy; or

(2) use the words "free," "no cost," or words of similar import in the marketing, advertising, or soliciting of, or otherwise promoting, the purchase of a policy.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.012. DISCLOSURES TO OWNERS. (a) The broker, or the provider if no broker is involved in the application, shall provide in writing, in a separate document that is signed by the owner, the following information to the owner not later than the date of application for a life settlement contract:

(1) the fact that possible alternatives to life settlement contracts exist, including accelerated benefits offered by the issuer of the life insurance policy;

(2) the fact that some or all of the proceeds of a life settlement contract may be taxable and that assistance should be sought from a professional tax advisor;

(3) the fact that the proceeds from a life settlement contract could be subject to the claims of creditors;

(4) the fact that receipt of proceeds from a life settlement contract may adversely affect the recipients' eligibility for public assistance or other government benefits or entitlements and that advice should be obtained from the appropriate agency;

(5) the fact that the owner has a right to terminate a life settlement contract within 15 days of the date the contract is executed by all parties and the owner has received the disclosures described in this section, that rescission, if exercised by the owner, is effective only if both notice of the rescission is given and the owner repays all proceeds and any premiums, loans, and loan interest paid on account of the provider during the rescission period, and that if the insured dies during the rescission period, the contract is considered rescinded subject to repayment by the owner or the owner's estate of all proceeds and any premiums, loans, and loan interest to the provider;

(6) the fact that proceeds will be sent to the owner within three business days after the provider has received the insurer or group administrator's acknowledgement that ownership of the policy or interest in the certificate has been transferred and the beneficiary has been designated in accordance with the terms of the life settlement contract;

(7) the fact that entering into a life settlement contract may cause the owner to forfeit other rights or benefits, including conversion rights and waiver of premium benefits that may exist under the policy or certificate of a group policy, and that assistance should be sought from a professional financial advisor;

(8) the amount and method of calculating the compensation, including anything of value, paid or given, or to be paid or given, to the broker, or any other person acting for the owner in connection with the transaction;

(9) the date by which the funds will be available to the owner and the identity of the transmitter of the funds;

(10) the fact that the commissioner requires delivery of a buyer's guide or a similar consumer advisory package in the form prescribed by the commissioner to owners during the solicitation process;

(11) the following language: "All medical, financial, or personal information solicited or obtained by a provider or broker about an insured, including the insured's identity or the identity of family members or a spouse or a significant other, may be disclosed as necessary to effect the life settlement contract between the owner and provider. If you are asked to provide this information, you will be asked to consent to the disclosure. The information may be provided to someone who buys the policy or provides funds for the purchase. You may be asked to renew your permission to share information every two years.";

(12) the fact that the commissioner requires providers and brokers to print separate signed fraud warnings on the applications and on the life settlement contracts as follows: "Any person who knowingly presents false information in an application for insurance or a life settlement contract is guilty of a crime and may be subject to fines and confinement in prison.";

(13) the fact that the insured may be contacted by either the provider or broker or an authorized representative of the provider or broker for the purpose of determining the insured's health status or to verify the insured's address and that this contact is limited to once every three months if the insured has a life expectancy of more than one year, and not more than once per month if the insured has a life expectancy of one year or less;

(14) the affiliation, if any, between the provider and the issuer of the insurance policy to be settled;

(15) that a broker represents exclusively the owner, and not the insurer or the provider or any other person, and owes a fiduciary duty to the owner, including a duty to act according to the owner's instructions and in the best interest of the owner;

(16) the name, address, and telephone number of the provider;

(17) the name, business address, and telephone number of the independent third party escrow agent, and the fact that the owner may inspect or receive copies of the relevant escrow or trust agreements or documents; and

(18) the fact that a change of ownership could in the future limit the insured's ability to purchase future insurance on the insured's life because there is a limit to how much coverage insurers will issue on one life.

(b) The written disclosures described by Subsection (a) must be conspicuously displayed in a life settlement contract furnished to the owner by a provider, including any affiliations or contractual arrangements between the provider and the broker.

(c) A broker shall provide the owner and the provider with at least the following disclosures not later than the date on which the life settlement contract is signed by all parties and which must be conspicuously displayed in the life settlement contract or in a separate document signed by the owner:

(1) the name, business address, and telephone number of the broker;

(2) a full, complete, and accurate description of all the offers, counter-offers, acceptances, and rejections relating to the proposed life settlement contract;

(3) a written disclosure of any affiliations or contractual arrangements between the broker and any person making an offer in connection with the proposed life settlement contract;

(4) the name of each broker who receives compensation and the amount of compensation, including anything of value, paid or given to the broker in connection with the life settlement contract; and

(5) a complete reconciliation of the gross offer or bid by the provider to the net amount of proceeds or value to be received by the owner.

(d) For the purpose of this section, "gross offer or bid" means the total amount or value offered by the provider for the purchase of one or more life insurance policies, inclusive of commissions and fees.

(e) The failure to provide the disclosures or rights described in this section is an unfair method of competition or an unfair or deceptive act or practice.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.013. DISCLOSURE TO INSURER. (a) Without limiting the ability of an insurer to assess the insurability of a policy applicant and to determine whether to issue the policy, and in addition to other questions an insurance carrier may lawfully pose to a life insurance applicant, an insurer may inquire in the application for insurance whether the proposed owner intends to pay premiums with the assistance of financing from a lender that will use the policy as collateral to support the financing.

(b) If, as described in Sections 1111A.002(11) and (11-A), the loan provides funds that can be used for a purpose other than paying for the premiums, costs, and expenses associated with obtaining and maintaining the life insurance policy and loan, and notwithstanding any other law, the application must be rejected as a violation of Section 1111A.017.

(c) If the financing does not violate Section 1111A.017, the insurance carrier:

(1) may make disclosures, not later than the date of the delivery of the policy, to the applicant and the insured, either on the application or on an amendment to the application that include the following or substantially similar statements:

"If you have entered into a loan arrangement in which the policy is used as collateral, and the policy does change ownership at some point in the future in satisfaction of the loan, the following may be true:

(A) a change of ownership could lead to a stranger owning an interest in the insured's life;

(B) a change of ownership could in the future limit your ability to purchase future insurance on the insured's life because there is a limit to how much coverage insurers will issue on one life;

(C) should there be a change of ownership and you wish to obtain more insurance coverage on the insured's life in the future, the insured's higher issue age, a change in health status, or other factors may reduce the ability to obtain coverage or may result in significantly higher premiums; and

(D) you should consult a professional advisor, since a change in ownership in satisfaction of the loan may result in tax consequences to the owner, depending on the structure of the loan.";

(2) may require certifications, such as the following, from the applicant or the insured:

(A) "I have not entered into any agreement or arrangement providing for the future sale of this life insurance policy";

(B) "My loan arrangement for this policy provides funds sufficient to pay for some or all of the premiums, costs, and expenses associated with obtaining and maintaining my life insurance policy, but I have not entered into any agreement by which I am to receive consideration in exchange for procuring this policy"; and

(C) "The borrower has an insurable interest in the insured."

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.014. GENERAL RULES. (a) Before entering into a life settlement contract with an owner of a policy with respect to which the insured is terminally or chronically ill, the provider must obtain:

(1) if the owner is the insured, a written statement from a licensed attending physician that the owner is of sound mind and under no constraint or undue influence to enter into a settlement contract; and

(2) a document in which the insured consents to the release of medical records to a provider, settlement broker, or insurance agent and, if the policy was issued less than two years after the date of application for a settlement contract, to the insurance company that issued the policy.

(b) An insurer shall respond to a request for verification of coverage submitted by a provider, settlement broker, or life insurance agent not later than the 30th calendar day after the date the request is received. The request for verification of coverage must be made on a form approved by the commissioner. The insurer shall complete and issue the verification of coverage or indicate in which respects the insurer is unable to respond. In the response, the insurer shall indicate whether at the time of the response, based on the medical evidence and documents provided, the insurer intends to pursue an investigation about the validity of the insurance contract.

(c) On or before the date of execution of the life settlement contract, the provider shall obtain a witnessed document in which the owner consents to the settlement contract, represents that the owner has a full and complete understanding of the settlement contract and of the benefits of the policy, acknowledges that the owner is entering into the settlement contract freely and voluntarily, and, for persons with a terminal or chronic illness or condition, acknowledges that the insured has a terminal or chronic illness and that the terminal or chronic illness or condition was diagnosed after the policy was issued.

(d) The insurer may not unreasonably delay effecting change of ownership or beneficiary with any life settlement contract lawfully entered into in this state or with a resident of this state.

(e) If a settlement broker or life insurance agent performs any of these activities required of the provider, the provider is deemed to have fulfilled the requirements of this section.

(f) If a broker performs the verification of coverage activities required of the provider, the provider is deemed to have fulfilled the requirements of Section 1111A.012.

(g) Not later than the 20th day after the date that an owner executes the life settlement contract, the provider shall give written notice to the insurer that issued that insurance policy that the policy has become subject to a life settlement contract. The notice shall be accompanied by the documents required by Section 1111A.013(c).

(h) Medical information solicited or obtained by a license holder is subject to the applicable provision of state law relating to confidentiality of medical information, if not otherwise provided in this chapter.

(i) A life settlement contract entered into in this state must provide that the owner may rescind the contract on or before 15 days after the date the contract is executed by all parties to the contract. Rescission, if exercised by the owner, is effective only if notice of the rescission is given and the owner repays all proceeds and any premiums, loans, and loan interest paid on account of the provider within the rescission period. If the insured dies during the rescission period, the contract is rescinded subject to repayment by the owner or the owner's estate of all proceeds and any premiums, loans, and loan interest to the provider.

(j) Not later than the third business day after the date the provider receives from the owner the documents to effect the transfer of the insurance policy, the provider shall pay the proceeds of the settlement into an escrow or trust account managed by a trustee or escrow agent in a state or federally chartered financial institution pending acknowledgement of the transfer by the issuer of the policy. The trustee or escrow agent shall transfer to the owner the proceeds due to the owner not later than the third business day after the date the trustee or escrow officer receives from the insurer acknowledgment of the transfer of the insurance policy.

(k) Failure to tender the life settlement contract proceeds to the owner on or before the date disclosed to the owner renders the contract voidable by the owner for lack of consideration until the time the proceeds are tendered to and accepted by the owner. A failure to give written notice of the right of rescission under this subsection tolls the right of rescission for 30 days after the date the written notice of the right of rescission has been given.

(l) A fee paid by a provider, an owner, or other person to a broker in exchange for services provided to the owner pertaining to a life settlement contract must be computed as a percentage of the offer obtained, not the face value of the policy. Nothing in this section prohibits a broker from voluntarily reducing the broker's fee to less than a percentage of the offer obtained.

(m) A broker shall disclose to the owner anything of value paid or given to a broker that relates to a life settlement contract.

(n) A person, at any time prior to or at the time of the application for, or issuance of, a policy, or during a two-year period beginning on the date of issuance of the policy, may not enter into a life settlement contract regardless of the date the compensation is to be provided and regardless of the date the assignment, transfer, sale, devise, bequest, or surrender of the policy is to occur. This prohibition does not apply if:

(1) the owner certifies to the provider that the policy was issued on the owner's exercise of conversion rights arising out of a group or individual policy, provided the total of the time covered under the conversion policy plus the time covered under the prior policy is at least 24 months; or

(2) the owner submits independent evidence to the provider that one or more of the following conditions have been met during the two-year period described by this subsection:

(A) the owner or insured is terminally or chronically ill;

(B) the owner or insured disposes of the owner's or insured's ownership interests in a closely held corporation, pursuant to the terms of a buyout or other similar agreement in effect at the time the insurance policy was initially issued;

(C) the owner's spouse dies;

(D) the owner divorces the owner's spouse;

(E) the owner retires from full-time employment;

(F) the owner becomes physically or mentally disabled and a physician determines that the disability prevents the owner from maintaining full-time employment; or

(G) a final order, judgment, or decree is entered by a court of competent jurisdiction, on the application of a creditor of the owner, adjudicating the owner bankrupt or insolvent, or approving a petition seeking reorganization of the owner or appointing a receiver, trustee, or liquidator to all or a substantial part of the owner's assets.

(o) For the purposes of Subsection (n)(1), time covered under a group policy must be calculated without regard to a change in insurance carriers, provided the coverage has been continuous and under the same group sponsorship.

(p) Copies of the independent evidence described by Subsection (n)(2) must be submitted to the insurer at the time the provider submits a request to the insurer for verification of coverage. The copies must be accompanied by a letter of attestation from the provider that the copies are true and correct copies of the documents received by the provider. This section does not prohibit an insurer from exercising its right to contest the validity of a policy.

(q) If the provider submits to the insurer a copy of independent evidence provided for Subsection (n)(2)(A) at the time the provider submits a request to the insurer to effect the transfer of the policy to the provider, the copy is deemed to establish that the settlement contract satisfies the requirements of this section.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.015. AUTHORITY TO ADOPT RULES. (a) The commissioner may adopt rules implementing this chapter and regulating the activities and relationships of providers, brokers, insurers, and their authorized representatives.

(b) The commissioner may not adopt a rule establishing a price or fee for the sale or purchase of a life settlement contract. This subsection does not prohibit the commissioner from adopting a rule relating to an unjust price or fee for the sale or purchase of a life settlement contract.

(c) The commissioner may not adopt a rule that regulates the actions of an investor providing money to a life or viatical settlement company.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.016. CONFLICT OF LAWS. (a) If there is more than one owner on a single policy, and the owners are residents of different states, the life settlement contract is governed by the law of the state in which the owner having the largest percentage ownership resides or, if the owners hold equal ownership, the state of residence of one owner agreed on in writing by all of the owners. The law of the state of the insured shall govern in the event that equal owners fail to agree in writing on a state of residence for jurisdictional purposes.

(b) A provider licensed in this state who enters into a life settlement contract with an owner who is a resident of another state that has enacted statutes or adopted rules governing life settlement contracts is governed in the effectuation of that life settlement contract by the statutes and rules of the owner's state of residence. If the state in which the owner is a resident has not enacted statutes or adopted rules governing life settlement contracts, the provider shall give the owner notice that neither state regulates the transaction on which the owner is entering. For transactions in those states, however, the provider shall maintain all records required by this chapter if the transactions were executed in this state. The forms used in those states need not be approved by the department.

(c) If there is a conflict in the laws that apply to an owner and a purchaser in any individual transaction, the laws of the state that apply to the owner shall take precedence and the provider shall comply with those laws.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.017. PROHIBITED PRACTICES. (a) A person may not:

(1) enter into a life settlement contract if the person knows or reasonably should have known that the life insurance policy was obtained by means of a false, deceptive, or misleading application for the policy;

(2) engage in a transaction, practice, or course of business if the person knows or reasonably should have known that the intent of engaging in the transaction, practice, or course of business is to avoid the notice requirements of this chapter;

(3) engage in a fraudulent act or practice in connection with a transaction relating to any settlement involving an owner who is a resident of this state;

(4) issue, solicit, market, or otherwise promote the purchase of an insurance policy for the purpose of, or with an emphasis on, settling the policy;

(5) if providing premium financing, receive any proceeds, fee, or other consideration from the policy or owner in addition to the amounts required to pay principal, interest, and any reasonable costs or expenses incurred by the lender or borrower in connection with the premium finance agreement, except in event of a default, unless either the default on the loan or transfer of the policy occurs pursuant to an agreement or understanding with any other person for the purpose of evading regulation under this chapter;

(6) with respect to any settlement contract or insurance policy and to a broker, knowingly solicit an offer from, effectuate a life settlement contract with, or make a sale to any provider, financing entity, or related provider trust that is controlling, controlled by, or under common control with the broker unless the relationship is fully disclosed to the owner;

(7) with respect to any life settlement contract or insurance policy and a provider, knowingly enter into a life settlement contract with an owner if, in connection with the life settlement contract, anything of value will be paid to a broker that is controlling, controlled by, or under common control with the provider or the financing entity or related provider trust that is involved in such settlement contract, unless the relationship is fully disclosed to the owner;

(8) with respect to a provider, enter into a life settlement contract unless the life settlement promotional, advertising, and marketing materials, as may be prescribed by rule, have been filed with the commissioner, provided that in no event may any marketing materials expressly reference that the insurance is free for any period of time; or

(9) with respect to any life insurance agent, insurance company, broker, or provider, make any statement or representation to the applicant or policyholder in connection with the sale or financing of a life insurance policy to the effect that the insurance is free or without cost to the policyholder for any period of time unless provided in the policy.

(b) A violation of this section is a fraudulent life settlement act.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.018. FRAUD PREVENTION AND CONTROL. (a) A person may not commit a fraudulent life settlement act.

(b) A person may not interfere with the enforcement of this chapter or an investigation of a suspected or actual violation of this chapter.

(c) A person in the business of life settlements may not knowingly or intentionally permit a person convicted of a felony involving dishonesty or breach of trust to participate in the business of life settlements.

(d) A life settlement contract and an application for a life settlement contract, regardless of the form of transmission, must contain the following, or a substantially similar, statement: "Any person who knowingly presents false information in an application for insurance or a life settlement contract is guilty of a crime and may be subject to fines and confinement in prison."

(e) The failure to include a statement as required in Subsection (d) is not a defense in any prosecution for a fraudulent life settlement act.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.019. MANDATORY REPORTING OF FRAUDULENT LIFE SETTLEMENT ACTS. A person engaged in the business of life settlements has a duty under Section 701.051 to report a fraudulent life settlement act.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.020. CONFIDENTIALITY. (a) The documents and evidence obtained by the commissioner in an investigation of a suspected or an actual fraudulent life settlement act are privileged and confidential, are not a public record, and are not subject to discovery or subpoena in a civil or criminal action.

(b) Subsection (a) does not prohibit release by the commissioner of documents and evidence obtained in an investigation of a suspected or an actual fraudulent life settlement act:

(1) in an administrative or judicial proceeding to enforce a provision of this code or another insurance law of this state;

(2) to a federal, state, or local law enforcement or regulatory agency, to an organization established for the purpose of detecting and preventing a fraudulent life settlement act, or to the National Association of Insurance Commissioners; or

(3) at the discretion of the commissioner, to a person in the business of life settlements that is aggrieved by a fraudulent life settlement act.

(c) Release of documents and evidence under Subsection (b) does not abrogate or modify the privilege granted in Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.021. OTHER LAW ENFORCEMENT OR REGULATORY AUTHORITY. This chapter does not:

(1) preempt the authority or relieve the duty of another law enforcement or regulatory agency to investigate, examine, and prosecute a suspected violation of law;

(2) preempt, supersede, or limit any provision of any state securities law or any rule, order, or notice issued under the law;

(3) prevent or prohibit a person from disclosing voluntarily information concerning life settlement fraud to a law enforcement or regulatory agency other than the department; or

(4) limit the powers granted by the laws of this state to the commissioner or an insurance fraud unit to investigate and examine a possible violation of law and to take appropriate action against wrongdoers.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.022. LIFE SETTLEMENT ANTIFRAUD INITIATIVES. (a) A provider or broker shall implement antifraud initiatives reasonably calculated to detect, prosecute, and prevent fraudulent life settlement acts. At the discretion of the commissioner, the commissioner may order, or a license holder may request and the commissioner may grant, a modification of the following required initiatives as necessary to ensure an effective antifraud program. A modification granted under this section may be more or less restrictive than the required initiatives so long as the modification may reasonably be expected to accomplish the purpose of this section. Antifraud initiatives must include:

(1) fraud investigators, who may be provider or broker employees or independent contractors; and

(2) an antifraud plan, which must be submitted to the commissioner and must include:

(A) a description of the procedures for detecting and investigating possible fraudulent life settlement acts and procedures for resolving material inconsistencies between medical records and insurance applications;

(B) a description of the procedures for reporting possible fraudulent life settlement acts to the commissioner;

(C) a description of the plan for antifraud education and training of underwriters and other personnel; and

(D) a description or chart outlining the organizational arrangement of the antifraud personnel who are responsible for the investigation and reporting of possible fraudulent life settlement acts and investigating unresolved material inconsistencies between medical records and insurance applications.

(b) An antifraud plan submitted to the commissioner is privileged and confidential, is not subject to disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code, and is not subject to discovery or subpoena in a civil action.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.023. INJUNCTION; CIVIL REMEDIES; CEASE AND DESIST ORDERS. (a) In addition to the penalties and other enforcement provisions of this chapter, if any person violates this chapter or any rule implementing this chapter, the commissioner may seek an injunction in a court in the county where the person resides or has a principal place of business and may apply for temporary and permanent orders that the commissioner determines necessary to restrain the person from further committing the violation.

(b) The commissioner may issue a cease and desist order against a person who violates any provision of this chapter, any rule or order adopted by the commissioner, or any written agreement entered into with the commissioner, in accordance with Chapter 82.

(c) If the commissioner finds that an action in violation of this chapter presents an immediate danger to the public and requires an immediate final order, the commissioner may issue an emergency cease and desist order under Chapter 83.

(d) The provisions of this chapter may not be waived by agreement. No choice of law provision may prevent the application of this chapter to any settlement.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.024. PENALTIES. (a) It is a violation of this chapter for any person, provider, broker, or any other party related to the business of life settlements to commit a fraudulent life settlement act.

(b) A person who knowingly, recklessly, or intentionally commits a fraudulent life settlement act commits a criminal offense and is subject to penalties under Chapter 35, Penal Code.

(c) Subtitle B, Title 2, applies to a violation of this chapter.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.025. APPLICABILITY OF OTHER INSURANCE LAWS. The following laws apply to a person engaged in the business of life settlements:

(1) Chapters 82, 83, 84, 101, 481, and 701;

(2) Sections 31.002, 32.021, 32.023, 32.041, 38.001, 81.004, 86.001, 86.051, 86.052, 201.004, 401.051, 401.054, 401.151(a), 521.003, 521.004, 543.001(c), 801.056, and 862.052;

(3) Subchapter A, Chapter 32;

(4) Subchapter C, Chapter 36;

(5) Subchapter B, Chapter 404; and

(6) Subchapter B, Chapter 491.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 1111A.026. APPLICABILITY OF CERTAIN PROVISIONS TO LIFE EXPECTANCY ESTIMATORS. (a) The following provisions do not apply to a broker who acts solely as a life expectancy estimator:

(1) Section 1111A.003(p);

(2) Section 1111A.012; and

(3) Sections 1111A.014(l) and (m).

(b) The commissioner may exempt a broker who acts only as a life expectancy estimator from other provisions of this chapter if the commissioner finds that the application of those provisions to the broker is not necessary for the public welfare.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 2277), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.